Utah statutes.
31A-23a-402.5.   Inducements.

(1) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (2), a licensee under this title, or an officer or employee of a licensee, may not induce a person to enter into, continue, or terminate an insurance contract by offering a benefit that is not:

(i)  specified in the insurance contract; or

(ii)  directly related to the insurance contract.

(b)  An insurer may not make or knowingly allow an agreement of insurance that is not clearly expressed in the insurance contract to be issued or renewed.

(c)  A licensee under this title may not absorb the tax under Section 31A-3-301.

(2)  This section does not apply to a title insurer, a title producer, or an officer or employee of a title insurer or title producer.

(3)  Items not prohibited by Subsection (1) include an insurer:

(a)  reducing premiums because of expense savings;

(b)  providing to a policyholder or insured one or more incentives, as defined by the commissioner by rule made in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, to participate in a program or activity designed to reduce claims or claim expenses, including:

(i)  a premium discount offered to a small or large employer group based on a wellness program if:

(A)  the premium discount for the employer group does not exceed 20% of the group premium; and

(B)  the premium discount based on the wellness program is offered uniformly by the insurer to all employer groups in the large or small group market;

(ii)  a premium discount offered to employees of a small or large employer group in an amount that does not exceed federal limits on wellness program incentives; or

(iii)  a combination of premium discounts offered to the employer group and the employees of an employer group, based on a wellness program, if:

(A)  the premium discounts for the employer group comply with Subsection (3)(b)(i); and

(B)  the premium discounts for the employees of an employer group comply with Subsection (3)(b)(ii); or

(c)  receiving premiums under an installment payment plan.

(4)  Items not prohibited by Subsection (1) include a licensee, or an officer or employee of a licensee, either directly or through a third party:

(a)  engaging in a usual kind of social courtesy if receipt of the social courtesy is not conditioned on the purchase of a particular insurance product;

(b)  extending credit on a premium to the insured:

(i)  without interest, for no more than 90 days from the effective date of the insurance contract;

(ii)  for interest that is not less than the legal rate under Section 15-1-1, on the unpaid balance after the time period described in Subsection (4)(b)(i); and

(iii)  except that an installment or payroll deduction payment of premiums on an insurance contract issued under an insurer's mass marketing program is not considered an extension of credit for purposes of this Subsection (4)(b);

(c)  preparing or conducting a survey that:

(i)  is directly related to an accident and health insurance policy purchased from the licensee; or

(ii)  is used by the licensee to assess the benefit needs and preferences of insureds, employers, or employees directly related to an insurance product sold by the licensee;

(d)  providing limited human resource services that are directly related to an insurance product sold by the licensee, including:

(i)  answering questions directly related to:

(A)  an employee benefit offering or administration, if the insurance product purchased from the licensee is accident and health insurance or health insurance; and

(B)  employment practices liability, if the insurance product offered by or purchased from the licensee is property or casualty insurance; and

(ii)  providing limited human resource compliance training and education directly pertaining to an insurance product purchased from the licensee;

(e)  providing the following types of information or guidance:

(i)  providing guidance directly related to compliance with federal and state laws for an insurance product purchased from the licensee;

(ii)  providing a workshop or seminar addressing an insurance issue that is directly related to an insurance product purchased from the licensee; or

(iii)  providing information regarding:

(A)  employee benefit issues;

(B)  directly related insurance regulatory and legislative updates; or

(C)  similar education about an insurance product sold by the licensee and how the insurance product interacts with tax law;

(f)  preparing or providing a form that is directly related to an insurance product purchased from, or offered by, the licensee;

(g)  preparing or providing documents directly related to a premium only cafeteria plan within the meaning of Section 125, Internal Revenue Code, or a flexible spending account, but not providing ongoing administration of a flexible spending account;

(h)  providing enrollment and billing assistance, including:

(i)  providing benefit statements or new hire insurance benefits packages; and

(ii)  providing technology services such as an electronic enrollment platform or application system;

(i)  communicating coverages in writing and in consultation with the insured and employees;

(j)  providing employee communication materials and notifications directly related to an insurance product purchased from a licensee;

(k)  providing claims management and resolution to the extent permitted under the licensee's license;

(l)  providing underwriting or actuarial analysis or services;

(m)  negotiating with an insurer regarding the placement and pricing of an insurance product;

(n)  recommending placement and coverage options;

(o)  providing a health fair or providing assistance or advice on establishing or operating a wellness program, but not providing any payment for or direct operation of the wellness program;

(p)  providing COBRA and Utah mini-COBRA administration, consultations, and other services directly related to an insurance product purchased from the licensee;

(q)  assisting with a summary plan description;

(r)  providing information necessary for the preparation of documents directly related to the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, 29 U.S.C. Sec. 1001, et seq., as amended;

(s)  providing information or services directly related to the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996, Pub. L. 104-191, 110 Stat. 1936, as amended, such as services directly related to health care access, portability, and renewability when offered in connection with accident and health insurance sold by a licensee;

(t)  sending proof of coverage to a third party with a legitimate interest in coverage;

(u)  providing information in a form approved by the commissioner and directly related to determining whether an insurance product sold by the licensee meets the requirements of a third party contract that requires or references insurance coverage;

(v)  facilitating risk management services directly related to the insurance product sold or offered for sale by the licensee, including:

(i)  risk management;

(ii)  claims and loss control services; and

(iii)  risk assessment consulting;

(w)  otherwise providing services that are legitimately part of servicing an insurance product purchased from a licensee; and

(x)  providing other directly related services approved by the department.

(5)  An inducement prohibited under Subsection (1) includes a licensee, or an officer or employee of a licensee:

(a) (i)  providing a premium or commission rebate;

(ii)  paying the salary of an employee of a person who purchases an insurance product from the licensee; or

(iii)  if the licensee is an insurer, or a third party administrator who contracts with an insurer, paying the salary for an onsite staff member to perform an act prohibited under Subsection (5)(b)(xii); or

(b)  engaging in one or more of the following unless a fee is paid in accordance with Subsection (7):

(i)  performing background checks of prospective employees;

(ii)  providing legal services by a person licensed to practice law;

(iii)  performing drug testing that is directly related to an insurance product purchased from the licensee;

(iv)  preparing employer or employee handbooks, except that a licensee may:

(A)  provide information for a medical benefit section of an employee handbook;

(B)  provide information for the section of an employee handbook directly related to an employment practices liability insurance product purchased from the licensee; or

(C)  prepare or print an employee benefit enrollment guide;

(v)  providing job descriptions, postings, and applications for a person that purchases an employment practices liability insurance product from the licensee;

(vi)  providing payroll services;

(vii)  providing performance reviews or performance review training;

(viii)  providing union advice;

(ix)  providing accounting services;

(x)  providing data analysis information technology programs, except as provided in Subsection (4)(h)(ii);

(xi)  providing administration of health reimbursement accounts or health savings accounts; or

(xii)  if the licensee is an insurer, or a third party administrator who contracts with an insurer, the insurer issuing an insurance policy that lists in the insurance policy one or more of the following prohibited benefits:

(A)  performing background checks of prospective employees;

(B)  providing legal services by a person licensed to practice law;

(C)  performing drug testing that is directly related to an insurance product purchased from the insurer;

(D)  preparing employer or employee handbooks;

(E)  providing job descriptions postings, and applications;

(F)  providing payroll services;

(G)  providing performance reviews or performance review training;

(H)  providing union advice;

(I)  providing accounting services;

(J)  providing discrimination testing; or

(K)  providing data analysis information technology programs.

(6)  A de minimis gift or meal not to exceed $25 for each individual receiving the gift or meal is presumed to be a social courtesy not conditioned on the purchase of a particular insurance product for purposes of Subsection (4)(a).

(7)  If as provided under Subsection (5)(b) a licensee is paid a fee to provide an item listed in Subsection (5)(b), the licensee shall comply with Subsection 31A-23a-501(2) in charging the fee, except that the fee paid for the item shall equal or exceed the fair market value of the item.



Amended by Chapter 253, 2012 General Session 

Amended by Chapter 279, 2012 General Session

